District of Columbia statutes.
13-421

Definition of person.

As used in this subchapter, the term “person” includes an individual, his executor, administrator, or other personal representative, or a corporation, partnership, association, or any other legal or commercial entity, whether or not a citizen or domiciliary of the District of Columbia and whether or not organized under the laws of the District of Columbia.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 13-421.
1973 Ed., § 13-421.